Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCALE REGIONAL PUBLIC SAFETY TRAINING FACILITY JOINT POWERS BOARD; BURN STRUCTURE AND SYSTEM UPGRADES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $1,788,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the Scott County Association for Leadership and Efficiency (SCALE) Public Safety Training Facility Joint Powers Board to construct and equip the replacement of aging and failing burn structures and associated technical and operational systems at the regional public safety training facility in the city of Jordan. This appropriation includes money to replace the Class A burn structure with a National Fire Protection Association compliant fire training tower and to upgrade the Class B burn structure technical and operational systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $1,788,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end